Louisiana, session 2026, HB370.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:3412.1(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3412.1. Grain and Cotton Indemnity Fund; creation; assessment; rules and
regulations; suspension of assessment; eligibility for reimbursement;
availability of money; prorated claims; reimbursement for administrative
expenses; failure to pay; subrogation
* * *
B. The commission shall charge an assessment at the rate of one twenty-fifth
two twenty-fifths of one percent on the value of all agricultural commodities
regulated under this Chapter which are sold to grain dealers and cotton merchants.
The assessments shall be due and payable to the commission by the licensee at the
first point of sale.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 370 ENROLLED
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.